Washington statutes.
RCW 18.225.140

Credentialed in another state—Licensed without examination—Reciprocity program.

(1) An applicant holding a credential in another state may be licensed to practice in this state without examination if the secretary determines that the other state's credentialing standards are substantially equivalent to the licensing standards in this state.

(2)(a)(i) The department shall establish a reciprocity program for applicants for licensure as an advanced social worker, an independent clinical social worker, a mental health counselor, or a marriage and family therapist in Washington.

(ii) The reciprocity program applies to applicants for a license as an advanced social worker, an independent clinical social worker, a mental health counselor, or a marriage and family therapist who:

(A) Hold or have held within the past 12 months a credential in good standing from another state or territory of the United States which has a scope of practice that is substantially equivalent to or greater than the scope of practice for the corresponding license as established under this chapter; and

(B) Have no disciplinary record or disqualifying criminal history.

(b) The department shall issue a probationary license to an applicant who meets the requirements of (a)(ii) of this subsection. The department must determine what deficiencies, if any, exist between the education and experience requirements of the other state's credential and, after consideration of the experience and capabilities of the applicant, determine whether it is appropriate to require the applicant to complete additional education or experience requirements to maintain the probationary license and, within a reasonable time period, transition to a full license. The department may place a reasonable time limit on a probationary license and may, if appropriate, require the applicant to pass a jurisprudential examination.

(c) The department must maintain and publish a list of credentials in other states and territories that the department has determined to have a scope of practice that is substantially equivalent to or greater than the scope of practice for licensed advanced social workers, independent clinical social workers, mental health counselors, or marriage and family therapists as established under this chapter. The department shall prioritize identifying and publishing the department's determination for the five states or territories that have historically had the most applicants for reciprocity under subsection (1) of this section with a scope of practice that is substantially equivalent to or greater than the scope of practice for licensed advanced social workers, independent clinical social workers, mental health counselors, and marriage and family therapists under this chapter.

[ 2023 c 425 s 4; 2019 c 351 s 3; 2001 c 251 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 425 ss 1-7, 13-20, and 22-26: See note following RCW 18.83.170.